Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Memory
Care and Alzheimer's Reformation Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14277 TJ 01/01/26






Req. No. 14277 Page 1